Utah statutes.
4-10-10.   Enforcement -- Inspection authorized -- Samples -- Reimbursement
for samples -- Warrants.
(1) The department shall have access to public and private premises where
articles subject to this chapter are manufactured, repaired, stored, or sold
for the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter. For purposes of
determining compliance, it may open any upholstered furniture, bedding, or
quilted clothing to obtain a sample for inspection and analysis of filling
material; or, if deemed appropriate, take the entire article for inspection
and analysis. Upon request, the department shall reimburse the owner or person
from whom the sample or article is taken for the actual cost of the sample or
article.
(2)  The department may proceed immediately, if admittance is refused, to
obtain an ex parte warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to
allow entry upon the premises for the purpose of making inspections and taking
samples or articles.
